Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1035.
do enact as follows:SB1035,13Section 1. 19.45 (8m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1035,2,3119.45 (8m) No individual who serves as a member of the legislature, for 12 2months following the date on which the individual ceases to hold office, may be 3employed as a lobbyist, as defined in s. 13.62 (11).SB1035,2,44